Utah statutes.
76-8-602.   Assuming liability for conferring jurisdiction upon justice court judge.

Any person who binds himself, or voluntarily becomes liable jointly or jointly and severally with any other person, for the purpose of conferring jurisdiction of any cause upon any justice court judge in any precinct or city that would be without jurisdiction except for the liability of the joint obligor, and any person who induces a person to assume the liability for the purpose of conferring jurisdiction upon the justice court judge, is guilty of a class B misdemeanor.



Amended by Chapter 59, 1990 General Session

